Iowa, session 2025-2026, 1424XD.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA:
TLSB 1424XD (5) 91
da/jh

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
Section 1. Section 9.11, subsection 1, unnumbered paragraph
1, Code 2025, is amended to read as follows:
“Document” means a document or record for filing by the
secretary as provided in the relevant filing statute as
follows:
Sec. 2. Section 9.11, subsection 1, paragraph h, Code 2025,
is amended to read as follows:
h. Chapter 501A, including as provided in section 501A.201A
501A.201, and as stated in section 501A.205 or as otherwise
described in sections 501A.231, 501A.302, 501A.1101, and
501A.1104.
Sec. 3. Section 9.14, subsection 4, paragraph b, unnumbered
paragraph 1, Code 2025, is amended to read as follows:
The secretary of state is not required to provide a four-day
or more period of service.
Sec. 4. NEW SECTION. 9.21 Definitions.
As used in this subchapter, unless the context otherwise
requires:
1. “Formation document” means a document or record for
filing by the secretary as provided in the relevant filing
statute as follows:
a. For a limited partnership under chapter 488, section
488.201 or 488.202.
b. For a limited liability company under chapter 489,
section 489.201, 489.202, or 489.1055.
c. For a business corporation under chapter 490, section
490.202, 490.922, 490.1006, or 490.1007.
d. For a nonprofit corporation under chapter 504, section
504.202, 504.1005, or 504.1006.
2. “Qualifying military service filer” means the filer of a
formation document, if the person is all of the following:
a. A resident of this state.
b. Any of the following:
(1) An individual serving as a member of the Iowa national
guard or a member of a reserve or regular component of the
LSB 1424XD (5) 91
-1- da/jh 1/5

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
armed forces of the United States.
(2) An individual serving as a member of the armed forces of
the United States on active duty.
(3) An individual who served in the armed forces of the
United States and was discharged under honorable conditions.
c. Either of the following:
(1) An individual who is eligible to sign the formation
document on behalf of a limited partnership as provided in
section 488.203, a limited liability company as provided in
section 489.203, a business corporation as provided in section
490.120, or a nonprofit corporation as provided in section
504.111.
(2) An individual who has an interest in the entity that
the subject of the filing, including as a general partner or
limited partner of a limited partnership; a member or manager
of a limited liability company; a director, officer, or
shareholder of a business corporation; or a director, officer,
or member of a nonprofit corporation.
3. “Secretary” means the secretary of state.
Sec. 5. NEW SECTION. 9.22 Rules.
1. The secretary shall adopt rules pursuant to chapter 17A
necessary or desirable to administer this subchapter.
2. The rules may provide procedures for the filing of
formation documents and criteria or evidence of military
service under this subchapter.
Sec. 6. NEW SECTION. 9.23 Fee waivers for qualified
military service filers —— formation documents.
Upon the request of a qualified military service filer, the
secretary shall waive the amount otherwise collected for filing
a formation document pursuant to the following:
1. For a limited partnership, section 488.117A.
2. For a limited liability company, section 489.122.
3. For a business corporation, section 490.122.
4. For a nonprofit corporation, section 504.113.
Sec. 7. Section 488.117A, Code 2025, is amended by adding
LSB 1424XD (5) 91
-2- da/jh 2/5

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
the following new subsection:
NEW SUBSECTION. 2A. Upon request by a qualified military
service filer, the secretary shall waive the amount otherwise
charged under this section for filing a formation document as
provided in chapter 9, subchapter III, limited to a certificate
of limited partnership as provided in section 488.201 or an
amendment to a certificate of limited partnership as provided
in section 488.202.
Sec. 8. Section 489.122, Code 2025, is amended by adding the
following new subsection:
NEW SUBSECTION. 2A. Upon request by a qualified military
service filer, the secretary shall waive the amount otherwise
charged under this section for filing a formation document as
provided in chapter 9, subchapter III, limited to a certificate
of organization as provided in section 489.201, an amendment to
a certificate of organization as provided in section 489.202,
a restatement of a certificate of organization as provided in
section 489.202, or a statement of domestication as provided in
section 489.1055.
Sec. 9. Section 490.122, Code 2025, is amended by adding the
following new subsection:
NEW SUBSECTION. 2A. Upon request by a qualified military
service filer, the secretary shall waive the amount otherwise
charged under this section for filing a formation document as
provided in chapter 9, subchapter III, limited to articles
of incorporation as provided in section 490.202, articles of
domestication as provided in section 490.922, an amendment to
the articles of incorporation as provided in section 490.1006,
or a restatement of the articles of incorporation as provided
in section 490.1007.
Sec. 10. Section 504.113, Code 2025, is amended by adding
the following new subsection:
NEW SUBSECTION. 2A. Upon request by a qualified military
service filer, the secretary shall waive the amount otherwise
charged under this section for filing a formation document as
LSB 1424XD (5) 91
-3- da/jh 3/5

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
provided in chapter 9, subchapter III, limited to articles of
incorporation as provided in section 504.202, an amendment to
the articles of incorporation as provided in section 504.1005,
or a restatement of the articles of incorporation as provided
in section 504.1006.
Sec. 11. CODE EDITOR DIRECTIVE. The Code editor shall
designate sections 9.21 through 9.23 as subchapter III within
chapter 9.